Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1

Select Oversight Committee on Corrections [Repealed]

3-15-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 34; 1995, ch. 10, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 34; Acts 1987, ch. 1, § 1; T.C.A., §3-15-108; Acts 1990, ch. 608, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 625, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 10, §§ 1, 2; 997, ch. 108, § 1; 2002, ch. 611, § 1; 2006, ch. 635, § 1; 2008, ch. 807, § 1, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 5, § 34; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 5, § 34; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 5, § 34; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 5, § 34; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 5, § 34; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 5, § 34; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 1, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.

3-15-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 34; T.C.A., §3-15-108; Acts 1990, ch. 608, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 625, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 10, § 2; 1997, ch. 108, § 1; 2002, ch. 611, § 1; 2006, ch. 635, § 1; 2008, ch. 807, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§3-15-101 —3-15-109 concerned the select oversight committee on corrections.